Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-219
Student; immunization status; Department of Health and Human Services; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the required levels of protection, provisional enrollment under the provisions of section 79-222, the evidence necessary to prove that the required examination or immunization has been received, and the reporting of each student's immunization status. The department may modify, add to, or delete from the list of required immunizations set out in section 79-217. The department shall furnish local school authorities with copies of such rules and regulations and any other material which will assist in the carrying out of sections 79-214 and 79-217 to 79-223.

Laws 1979, LB 59, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 129;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-444.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 813;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 159;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 65;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 709.